Louisiana, session 2026, HB878.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:1104(F) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1104. Duties and powers of the secretary; rules and regulations; permits
* * *
F. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the secretary
shall not permit the geologic storage of carbon dioxide beneath a natural and scenic
river system as designated by R.S. 56:1840 et al.